Wyoming, session 2026, HB0010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-125, 18-7-107 and 21-3-138 are
created to read:

1-39-125. Liability; sexually explicit materials in
children's sections of libraries.

HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080
A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 18-7-107 or 21-3-138 in accordance with
W.S. 18-7-107 or 21-3-138.

18-7-107. Sexually explicit materials available to
children; requirements; penalties; cause of action.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Children's section" means any portion of a
library devoted primarily to or that provides materials
aimed toward persons younger than age eighteen (18);

(ii) "Sexually explicit material" means any
depiction or description, in any written, pictorial or
electronic form, of sexual contact by any one (1) or more
of the following:

(A) Penetration of the penis into the
vagina or anus;

HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080
(B) Contact between the mouth and genitalia
or mouth and anus or by contact between the genitalia of
one (1) person and the genitalia or anus of another person;

(C) Contact between the finger, hand or
other body part of one (1) person and the genitalia or anus
of another person, except in the course of an examination
or treatment by a person licensed to provide care or
treatment under title 33 of the Wyoming statutes;

(D) Ejaculation onto the person of another;

(E) The use of artificial sexual organs or
substitutes to contact with the genitalia or anus;

(F) The touching of a person's own genitals
or anus with a finger, hand, artificial sexual organ or
other similar device.

(b) Each public library and employee and contractor
of a public library shall ensure that:

HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080
(i) No sexually explicit materials are
accessible in the children's section of the library at any
time;

(ii) Sexually explicit materials are cataloged,
located and stored in a section of the library devoted
primarily to or that provides materials aimed toward
persons age eighteen (18) and older.

(c) Each county library board of directors shall
establish a process by which any resident of the county in
which the library is located may challenge the inclusion,
placement or presence of any sexually explicit material in
the children's section of the library, in accordance with
all of the following:

(i) Each county library board shall establish a
form by which any resident of the county in which the
library is located may challenge a sexually explicit
material being located in the children's section of the
library;

HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080
(ii) The form established under paragraph (i) of
this subsection shall be made available at each physical
location of the county library and on the website of the
county library;

(iii) Each county library shall accept
challenges to sexually explicit material under this
subsection at any time;

(iv) A county library receiving a challenge
under this subsection shall review the challenged material
to determine whether it is sexually explicit material and
whether the material is located in the children's section
of the library and render a written decision on the
challenge not later than sixty (60) days after written or
electronic receipt of the challenge.

(d) Not later than August 1, 2026, each county
library board of directors shall develop the challenge
process specified in and in accordance with subsection (c)
of this section. A county library that fails to develop and
implement the challenge process in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section by August 1, 2026 shall pay
HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080
a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500.00) each day
until the library develops the process.

(e) Any resident of the county in which the public
library is located shall have a cause of action against a
library violating this section. No person shall initiate a
lawsuit against a library under this subsection without
first completing the challenge process specified in
subsection (c) of this section. No lawsuit shall be brought
under this subsection if sexually explicit material is
moved or removed from the children's section of the library
after a challenge is brought under subsection (c) of this
section. A court may order any injunctive or equitable
relief, award damages, costs or fees or order any other
legal remedy permitted by law. The court shall award
reasonable attorney fees and costs to a person prevailing
in an action brought under this subsection.

21-3-138. Sexually explicit materials in school
libraries; penalties; cause of action.

(a) As used in this section, "sexually explicit
material" means as defined by W.S. 18-7-107(a)(ii).
HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080

(b) Each school district, and each employee and
contractor of the school district, shall ensure that no
sexually explicit materials are accessible by any student
in any library of the school district.

(c) Each school district board of trustees shall
establish a process by which any person who resides within
the geographical boundaries of the school district may
challenge the inclusion, placement or presence of any
sexually explicit material in a school district library, in
accordance with all of the following:

(i) Each school district board of trustees shall
establish a form by which any person who resides within the
geographical boundaries of the school district may
challenge a sexually explicit material being located in a
school district library;

(ii) The form established under paragraph (i) of
this subsection shall be made available at each physical
location of the school district where a library is located
and on the website of the school district;
HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080

(iii) Each school district board of trustees
shall accept challenges to sexually explicit material under
this subsection at any time;

(iv) A school district board of trustees
receiving a challenge under this subsection shall review
the challenged material to determine whether it is sexually
explicit material and whether the material is located in
the library of the school district and render a written
decision on the challenge not later than sixty (60) days
after written or electronic receipt of the challenge.

(d) Not later than August 1, 2026, each school
district board of trustees shall develop the challenge
process specified in and in accordance with subsection (c)
of this section. A school district that fails to develop
and implement the challenge process in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section by August 1, 2026 shall pay
a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500.00) each day
until the school district develops the process.

HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080
(e) Any person who resides within the geographical
boundaries of the school district shall have a cause of
action against a school district violating this section. No
person shall initiate a lawsuit against a school district
under this subsection without first completing the
challenge process specified in subsection (c) of this
section. No lawsuit shall be brought under this subsection
if sexually explicit material is moved or removed from the
school district library after a challenge is brought under
subsection (c) of this section. A court may order any
injunctive or equitable relief, award damages, costs or
fees or order any other legal remedy permitted by law. The
court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a
person prevailing in an action brought under this
subsection.

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ix) and 1-39-104(a) are
amended to read:

1-39-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

HB0010

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0080
(ix) "This act" means W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-123 1-39-125.

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112 and 1-39-122 through
1-39-124 1-39-125. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0010